Washington statutes.
RCW 25.12.080

Suits by and against limited partnership—Parties.

All actions, suits or proceedings respecting the business of such partnership shall be prosecuted by and against the general partners only, except in those cases where special partners or partnerships are to be deemed general partners or partnerships, in which case all the partners deemed general partners may join therein; and excepting also those cases where special partners are severally liable on account of sums or amounts received or withdrawn from the capital stock as provided in RCW 25.12.070.

[ 1955 c 15 s 25.12.080. Prior: 1869 p 381 s 8; RRS s 9973.]